Massachusetts, session 194th, S723.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 15 of Chapter 167I of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the first paragraph and inserting in place
thereof the following two paragraphs:-
Subject to the written approval of the commissioner, a bank may be dissolved and
liquidate its affairs if authorized by a vote passed, at a meeting specially called to consider the
subject, by at least 2/3 of the voting body of the bank. A committee of 3 members prescribed by
the commissioner, shall liquidate the assets and after satisfying all debts of the bank shall
distribute the remaining proceeds among those entitled thereon in proportion to their respective
interests therein.
of 2

If the liquidation of a mutual bank or stock bank is to be effected in whole or in part
through the sale of any of its assets to and the assumption of its deposit and other liabilities,
including all contingent liabilities, by a bank in mutual form or by a credit union as part of a
business combination, the purchase and sale agreement must also be approved pursuant to
section 8 of this chapter. The commissioner shall establish expedited liquidation procedures for
such business combination transactions whereby the mutual bank or stock bank is dissolved
immediately after the combination. However, if any liabilities will remain in the mutual bank or
stock bank, the standard liquidation procedures shall apply.
SECTION 2. Chapter 171 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding after
section 78A the following section:-
Section 78B. A credit union may purchase in whole or in part any of the assets of and
assume the deposit liabilities of any mutual bank or stock bank pursuant to section 8 of chapter
167I and the mutual bank or stock bank may be liquidated under the expedited procedures for
such business combination transactions under section 15 of said chapter 167I. If the main office
and branches of such bank are purchased, they shall become branches of the credit union without
any other approval required. The depositors of such bank shall become members of the credit
union within 2 years after such transaction is approved or for such longer period as may be
approved by the commissioner.
of 2